Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 2

Soybean Promotion Act

43-20-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Soybean Promotion Act.”

Acts 1985, ch. 108, § 1.

Cross-References. Contracts to raise and sell farm products, title 43, ch. 15.

Cooperative marketing associations, title 43, ch. 16.

Promotion of leadership in agricultural and home economics programs at post-secondary institutions, title 49, ch. 7, part 7.

Sale of pecans, title 43, ch. 17.

Tobacco sales, title 43, ch. 19.

43-20-202. Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds that it is in the interest of the public welfare that Tennessee farmers who are producers of soybeans be encouraged and permitted to act jointly and in cooperation with other producers to levy upon themselves an assessment upon soybeans, for the purpose of financing programs of research, promotion, advertising and other programs designed to increase the production of soybeans and to increase the consumption, use and sale of soybeans and soybean products in Tennessee, national and international markets.

Acts 1985, ch. 108, § 2.

Cross-References. Contracts to raise and sell farm products, title 43, ch. 15.

Contracts to raise and sell farm products, title 43, ch. 15.

43-20-203. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the Tennessee soybean promotion board established by § 43-20-102;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture;

“Department” means the department of agriculture;

“Producer” means a person who produces soybeans as an ongoing commercial operation and includes any landowner who shares in the production costs or the proceeds of the sale of any soybeans that are grown on the landowner's land; and

“Purchaser” means any person, public or private corporation, federal commodity credit corporation, association or partnership, buying, accepting shipment or otherwise accepting the property, in or to soybeans from a producer, and includes a mortgagee, pledgee, lienor, or other person, public or private, having a claim against the producer when the actual or constructive possession of the soybeans is taken as part payment or in satisfaction of the mortgage, pledge, lien, or claim.

Acts 1985, ch. 108, § 3; 1987, ch. 183, § 1.

43-20-204. Legality of associations, meetings or actions — Restraint of trade.

No association, meeting or act undertaken pursuant to this part and intended to benefit the producers and purchasers of soybeans is illegal or in restraint of trade.

Acts 1985, ch. 108, § 4.

43-20-205. Assessment on producers — Application for referendum.

Any commission, council, board or other entity that is fairly representative of soybean producers may make application to the commissioner requesting a referendum of producers of soybeans upon the question of whether an assessment of a specified amount should be levied, collected and disbursed under this part, or whether a prior assessment should be amended or terminated. The application shall state the amount of the assessment per bushel that is to be proposed in the referendum, and a brief statement of the purposes for which the funds collected will be spent.

Acts 1985, ch. 108, § 5.

Cross-References. Assessment levied on producers, § 43-20-103.

43-20-206. Date of referendum — Notice.

Within thirty (30) days of receipt of an application requesting a referendum, the commissioner shall set a date for the referendum, which shall not be more than sixty (60) days after receipt of the application, and shall publish by newspaper, the date of the referendum, the polling places and the hours they will be open, the amount of the proposed assessment, and the date the assessment shall begin, if adopted.

Acts 1985, ch. 108, § 6.

43-20-207. Referendum.

Any referendum held under this part shall be conducted statewide, under the control and direction of the commissioner. The polling place in each county shall be the offices of the University of Tennessee agricultural extension office. All ballots shall be provided at the polling places.

Each person seeking to vote in the referendum shall be required to sign an affidavit stating that the person is a producer as defined in § 43-20-203. Upon signing an affidavit, the person shall be eligible to vote. Any producer that is a corporation shall have only one (1) vote.

The question to be decided at the first referendum shall be in the following form:

“Shall the producers of soybeans assess themselves at the rate of cents per bushel of soybeans sold, and use the funds so collected by the department of agriculture and paid over to the Tennessee soybean promotion board to finance a program of research, education, market development, marketing, advertising and other methods designed to promote the increased production, consumption, use and sale of soybeans and soybean products?”

The affirmative vote of a majority of the number of votes cast shall adopt the proposed assessment.

Within ten (10) days after the referendum, the commissioner shall canvass the votes and publicly announce the result of the referendum.

The expenses of referenda held under this part shall be paid by the department until an assessment is levied. Expenses of subsequent referenda shall be paid from the Tennessee soybean promotion fund.

No referendum pursuant to this part shall be held within one (1) year of any preceding referendum.

Acts 1985, ch. 108, § 7.

43-20-208. Deductions.

The assessed rate, as approved by referendum, shall be deducted by the purchaser from the amount paid the producer at the first point of sale. Within twenty (20) days after the end of each calendar month, each purchaser shall remit to the board the total amount of funds withheld from producers.

Acts 1985, ch. 108, § 8; 1987, ch. 183, §§ 5, 6; 1987, ch. 352, § 5; 1991, ch. 157, § 1.

43-20-209. Records of purchasers.

Each purchaser shall keep a complete and accurate record of all soybeans handled by that purchaser and shall furnish each producer with a signed sales slip showing the number of bushels purchased from that producer and the amount deducted by the purchaser for the Tennessee soybean promotion fund. Such records shall be kept for two (2) years and be open to inspection at any time with or without notice by the commissioner, the board or its representatives. The board may, from time to time, require any purchaser to submit records and reports deemed necessary for the collection of the assessment.

Acts 1985, ch. 108, § 9; 1991, ch. 157, § 2.

43-20-210. Applications for refunds — Refund forms.

Within ninety (90) days of an assessment being withheld by the purchaser, any producer may make application, on forms to be prescribed by the board, to the board for a refund of assessments withheld. The application shall be accompanied by copies of sales slips signed by the purchaser evidencing the withheld assessments for which refund is sought.

Refund forms shall be made available in each University of Tennessee county extension office, and shall be displayed and made available to producers at those locations.

Acts 1985, ch. 108, § 10; 1987, ch. 271, § 1; 1991, ch. 157, § 3.

43-20-211. Referendum on assessment remaining in effect.

If the commissioner determines that during the first two (2) years the assessment is in effect that over fifty percent (50%) of the proceeds generated by the assessment is being refunded, then the commissioner shall conduct a referendum, within one hundred twenty (120) days of the end of the two-year period, on whether the assessment shall remain in effect.

Acts 1985, ch. 108, § 11.

43-20-212. Use of funds — Prohibited use of funds — Minutes — Reports.

The board shall expend the proceeds of the assessment solely to finance a program of research, education, market development, marketing, advertising and other methods designed to promote the increased consumption, production, use and sale of soybean and soybean products. The board may accept gifts and grants, and shall invest its idle funds.

The board shall not expend its funds in any manner for political purposes, or to influence any rule-making process, either state or federal. The board shall submit the minutes of all meetings and an annual detailed financial statement to the commissioner, the clerk of the house of representatives, the clerk of the senate and the state library and archives. The annual report shall include, but not be limited to, a list of all grantees of funds and a status report of all grants, indicating utilization of grant funds in compliance with this section.

Acts 1985, ch. 108, § 12; 1987, ch. 352, § 6; 2014, ch. 620, § 4.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment deleted the former second sentence in (a) which read: “Members of the board shall not be compensated but shall be reimbursed travel expenses in accordance with the travel regulations promulgated by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 620, § 6. April 4, 2014.

Cross-References. Funds used for research and promotion and political use of funds prohibited, § 43-20-105.

43-20-213. Personal debt of purchaser — Late payment penalty.

Any amount withheld, or that should have been withheld, by the purchaser due to the assessment shall be a personal debt of the purchaser. If the purchaser's monthly payments to the board are not timely made, a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the amount due shall be imposed. The board is authorized to collect assessments due by any legal proceeding in a court of competent jurisdiction.

Acts 1985, ch. 108, § 13; 1991, ch. 157, § 4.

43-20-214. Waiver of assessment.

Upon the effective date of an assessment levied pursuant to this part, the commissioner may waive the assessment imposed in § 43-20-103(a). It is the express intent of the general assembly that only one (1) assessment for the promotion of soybeans be in effect at any time.

Acts 1985, ch. 108, § 14.

43-20-215. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to provide for the implementation of this part.

Acts 1985, ch. 108, § 15.

43-20-216. Agreements for collection of assessments or collateral.

The board may enter into an agreement with the federal commodity credit corporation to collect the specified assessment on all soybeans pledged as collateral for a commodity credit corporation price support loan or purchased by the commodity credit corporation under its loan or its purchase programs.

Acts 1987, ch. 183, § 2.